Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 11 Trial by Jury

Cross references. —

For provision that trial by jury shall be inviolate, see art. 1, § 9, Wyo. Const.

For provision that cases in police justice courts in cities of the first class shall be tried without juries, see §

5-6-207

.

As to jury trial in circuit courts, see §

5-9-136

.

As to jury trials in criminal cases generally, see §§

7-11-101

to

7-11-206

.

As to jury inquest into sanity of prisoner, see §

7-11-305

.

As to appointing jury to determine pregnancy of female condemned to death, see §

7-13-912

.

As to trial by jury, see Rules 38 and 39, W.R.C.P.

All statutes relating to jurors must be considered in pari materia.

Lofton v. State, 489 P.2d 1169,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1971), cert. denied, 406 U.S. 949, 92 S. Ct. 2049, 32 L. Ed. 2d 337, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 2587 (U.S. 1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to jury trial in stockholders' derivative action, 32 ALR4th 1111.

Right to jury trial in action for declaratory relief in state court, 33 ALR4th 146.

Propriety of substituting juror in bifurcated state trial after end of first phase and before second phase is given to jury, 89 ALR4th 423.

89 C.J.S. Trial §§ 1031 to 1034.